Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3328
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the use of all proven techniques for the enforcement of support orders. It is also the intent of the Legislature to effectuate reasonable welfare reform and to comply with the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996. The Legislature finds and declares that a bank match system and the potential for an administrative attachment of personal assets of an obligor held by a payor or held by a financial institution is an effective tool for the collection of unpaid support from obligors who are not in compliance with support orders. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage obligors to comply with their legal obligations and to add to the tools available for the enforcement of support orders by authorizing the Department of Health and Human Services and county attorneys or authorized attorneys to initiate bank match actions and administrative attachments as described in sections 43-3328 to 43-3339.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 28.